Illinois, session 104th, SB2940.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Operating Room Patient Safety Act. 6    Section 3. Purpose. It is the public policy of the State 7that the State has a legitimate interest in ensuring that all 8surgical procedures are performed to ensure maximum patient 9safety. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to: 10        (1) ensure that an operating room has been prepared by 11    qualified, trained professionals; 12        (2) ensure that surgical equipment and instruments are 13    properly sterilized and functioning safely; 14        (3) ensure that during surgical procedures, the 15    surgical team can rely on qualified, trained professionals 16    to ensure a sterile environment is maintained; and 17        (4) provide the surgical team with proper instruments 18    and supplies as requested. 19    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:20    "Health care facility" means a facility regulated under 21the Hospital Licensing Act, the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment 22Center Act, or the University of Illinois Hospital Act.   SB2940- 2 -LRB104 17110 BAB 30529 b1"Health care facility" does not include: (i) a health care 2facility that is a critical access hospital as designated by 3the Department of Public Health in accordance with 42 CFR 485, 4Subpart F; (ii) a rural emergency hospital as defined under 5subsection (kkk)(2) of Section 1861 of the federal Social 6Security Act; or (iii) a health care facility that is located 7more than 60 miles from a nationally accredited surgical 8technology program located in Illinois.9    "Surgical technologist" means an individual who is 10employed by or contracts with a health care facility to 11perform surgical technology services and functions. 12    "Surgical technology services" means surgical patient care 13including, but not limited to, one or more of the following: 14        (1) preparation of an operating room and the sterile 15    operating field for surgical procedures, by ensuring that 16    surgical equipment is functioning properly and safely, and 17    using sterile techniques to prepare surgical supplies, 18    instruments, and equipment; 19        (2) intraoperative anticipation and response to the 20    needs of surgeons, nurses, and other surgical team members 21    by monitoring the sterile operating field in an operating 22    room and providing the required instruments or supplies; 23        (3) performance of tasks at the sterile operating 24    field, as directed in an operating room setting, 25    including: 26            (A) passing surgical supplies, instruments, and   SB2940- 3 -LRB104 17110 BAB 30529 b1        equipment directly to a health care provider; 2            (B) sponging or suctioning an operative site; 3            (C) preparing and cutting suture material; 4            (D) transferring and irrigating with fluids; 5            (E) transferring, but not administering, drugs 6        within the sterile field; or 7            (F) handling surgical specimens. 8    Section 10. Requirements for surgical technologists. Each 9surgical technologist hired or contracted by a health care 10facility on or after January 1, 2028 shall meet one or more of 11the following requirements: 12        (1) The surgical technologist has successfully 13    completed a nationally accredited program for surgical 14    technologists and is certified through the National Board 15    of Surgical Technology and Surgical Assisting or the 16    National Center for Competency Testing.17        (2) If the surgical technologist has successfully 18    completed the educational requirements under paragraph (1) 19    but has not, on the date the surgical technologist is 20    hired or enters into the contract with the health care 21    facility, obtained the national certification under 22    paragraph (1), the surgical technologist must obtain that 23    certification within 18 months after being hired or 24    entering into the contract. 25        (3) The surgical technologist is registered as a   SB2940- 4 -LRB104 17110 BAB 30529 b1    registered surgical technologist under the Registered 2    Surgical Assistant and Registered Surgical Technologist 3    Title Protection Act. 4        (4) The surgical technologist has successfully 5    completed a training program for surgical technology in 6    the armed forces of the United States or the United States 7    Public Health Service.8        (5) The surgical technologist has engaged in the 9    practice of surgical technology at a hospital licensed 10    under the Hospital Licensing Act or an ambulatory surgical 11    treatment center licensed under the Ambulatory Surgical 12    Treatment Center Act before January 1, 2028. 13    Section 15. Exemptions. 14    (a) Health care facilities located in a Health 15Professional Shortage Area or Medically Underserved Area, as 16determined by the federal government, shall be exempt from 17Section 10 of this Act but shall have a hiring preference for 18surgical technologists who graduated from nationally 19accredited surgical technology programs and are certified 20through the National Board of Surgical Technology and Surgical 21Assisting or the National Center for Competency Testing.22    (b) Nothing in this Act prohibits:23        (1) a person licensed in this State under any other 24    Act from engaging in the practice for which the person is 25    licensed, including, but not limited to, a physician   SB2940- 5 -LRB104 17110 BAB 30529 b1    licensed to practice medicine in all its branches, a 2    physician assistant, an advanced practice registered 3    nurse, or a nurse performing surgery-related tasks within 4    the scope of the nurse's license or registration; or5        (2) a student or intern from performing surgical 6    technology services under direct supervision, as defined 7    in the Registered Surgical Assistant and Registered 8    Surgical Technologist Title Protection Act.